sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Produkty starostlivosti o domácich miláčikov > Utierky pre domácich miláčikov: Dezodoračné utierky; Utierky na čistenie uší; Utierky na čistenie očí; Obyčajné čistiace utierky; Čistiace utierky; Hypoalergénne utierky; Utierky na čistenie labiek; Utierky na výtoky z očí
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 宠物美容用品 > 宠物湿巾: 除臭湿巾; 耳朵清洁湿巾; 眼睛清洁湿巾; 通用清洁湿巾; 美容湿巾; 防过敏湿巾; 爪子清洁湿巾; 泪痕湿巾
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 미용 용품 > 반려동물용 물티슈: 냄새 제거용 물티슈; 귀 세척용 물티슈; 눈 세척용 물티슈; 일반 세척용 물티슈; 그루밍용 물티슈; 저자극성 물티슈; 발 세척용 물티슈; 눈물자국 제거용 물티슈
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru toaleta animalelor de companie > Șervețele pentru animale de companie: Șervețele dezodorizante; Șervețele pentru curățarea urechilor; Șervețele pentru curățarea ochilor; Șervețele pentru curățare; Șervețele pentru îngrijire; Șervețele hipoalergenice; Șervețele pentru curățarea labelor; Șervețele pentru petele de lacrimi
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Articoli per toelettatura animali domestici > Salviettine per animali domestici: Salviette deodoranti; Salviette per la pulizia delle orecchie; Salviette per la pulizia degli occhi; Salviette per la pulizia generale; Salviette per la toelettatura; Salviette ipoallergeniche; Salviette per la pulizia delle zampe; Salviette antimacchia
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Sản phẩm chăm sóc thú cưng > Khăn ướt dành cho vật nuôi: Khăn ướt khử mùi; Khăn ướt lau tai; Khăn ướt lau mắt; Khăn ướt vệ sinh chung; Khăn ướt lau lông; Khăn ướt không gây dị ứng; Khăn ướt lau chân; Khăn ướt lau vết ố vùng khóe mắt
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Naminių gyvūnų kailio priežiūros reikmenys > Servetėlės naminiams gyvūnams: Dezodoruojančios servetėlės; Ausų valymo servetėlės; Akių valymo servetėlės; Bendrosios paskirties valymo servetėlės; Kailio priežiūros servetėlės; Hipoalerginės servetėlės; Letenų valymo servetėlės; Ašarų dėmių servetėlės
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Tımarlama Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Havluları: Koku Giderici Mendil; Kulak Temizleme Mendili; Göz Temizleme Mendili; Genel Temizlik Mendilleri; Bakım Mendilleri; Hipoalerjenik Mendiller; Pati Temizleme Mendili; Gözyaşı Lekesi Mendilleri
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Productos de higiene para mascotas > Toallitas para mascotas: Toallitas desodorizantes; Toallitas para limpiar los oídos; Toallitas para limpiar los ojos; Toallitas de limpieza generales; Toallitas de aseo; Toallitas hipoalergénicas; Toallitas para limpiar las patas; Toallitas para manchas de lágrimas
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Matériel de toilettage pour animaux de compagnie > Lingettes pour animaux de compagnie: Lingettes désodorisantes; Lingettes nettoyantes pour les oreilles; Lingettes nettoyantes pour les yeux; Lingettes nettoyantes générales; Lingettes de toilettage; Lingettes hypoallergéniques; Lingettes nettoyantes pour pattes; Lingettes anti-taches de larmes
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Vachtverzorgingsproducten voor huisdieren > Dierendoekjes: Ontgeurende doekjes; Oorreinigingsdoekjes; Oogreinigingsdoekjes; Algemene reinigingsdoekjes; Trimdoekjes; Hypoallergene doekjes; Pootreinigingsdoekjes; Traanvlekdoekjes
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos de tosquia para animais de estimação > Toalhetes para animais de estimação: Toalhetes desodorizantes; Toalhetes para limpeza de orelhas; Toalhetes para limpeza de olhos; Toalhetes de limpeza geral; Toalhetes de tratamento; Toalhetes hipoalergénicos; Toalhetes para limpeza das patas; Toalhetes para manchas de lágrimas
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > ペット用グルーミング用品 > ペット用ウェットティッシュ: 消臭ワイプ; 耳掃除ワイプ; 目の洗浄用ワイプ; 一般的なクリーニングワイプ; グルーミングワイプ; 低刺激性ワイプ; 足のクリーニングワイプ; 涙やけワイプ
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro péči o vzhled domácích zvířat > Čisticí ubrousky pro domácí zvířata: Deodorační ubrousky; Ubrousky na čištění uší; Ubrousky na čištění očí; Univerzální čisticí ubrousky; Ubrousky pro péči o srst; Hypoalergenní ubrousky; Ubrousky na čištění tlapek; Ubrousky na čištění očních sekretů a ospalků
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Haustierpflegeartikel > Feuchttücher für Haustiere: Geruchsentfernende Tücher; Ohrenreinigungstücher; Augenreinigungstücher; Allzweck-Reinigungstücher; Fellpflegetücher; Hypoallergene Tücher; Pfotenreinigungstücher; Tränenfleckentücher
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Pälsvårdstillbehör för husdjur > Våtservetter för husdjur: Deodoriserande våtservetter; Öronrengöringsservetter; Ögonrengöringsservetter; Allmänna rengöringsservetter; Grooming-servetter; Hypoallergena våtservetter; Tassrengöringsservetter; Tårfläcksservetter
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Háziállatápolási kellékek > Háziállat-törlőkendők: Szagtalanító törlőkendők; Fültisztító törlőkendők; Szemtisztító törlőkendők; Általános tisztító törlőkendők; Ápoló törlőkendők; Hipoallergén törlőkendők; Mancstisztító törlőkendők; Szemkörnyéki folt törlőkendők
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์เสริมสวยสัตว์เลี้ยง > ทิชชู่เปียกสำหรับสัตว์เลี้ยง: ทิชชู่เปียกดับกลิ่น; ทิชชู่เปียกเช็ดหู; ทิชชู่เปียกเช็ดดวงตา; ทิชชู่เปียกทั่วไป; ทิชชู่เปียกกรูมมิ่ง; ทิชชู่เปียกสูตรลดการเกิดอาการแพ้; ทิชชู่เปียกเช็ดอุ้งเท้า; ทิชชู่เปียกเช็ดคราบน้ำตา
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для ухода за домашними животными > Салфетки для ухода за домашними животными: Дезодорирующие салфетки; Гигиенические салфетки для ушей; Гигиенический салфетки для глаз; Универсальные гигиенические салфетки; Салфетки для шерсти; Гипоаллергенные салфетки; Салфетки для очистки лап; Салфетки для удаления слезных пятен
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za nego hišnih ljubljenčkov > Čistilni robčki za hišne ljubljenčke: Osvežilni robčki; Robčki za čiščenje ušes; Robčki za čiščenje oči; Robčki za splošno čiščenje; Robčki za nego; Hipoalergenski robčki; Robčki za čiščenje šap; Robčki za odstranjevanje madežev solz
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Pelsplejning til kæledyr > Vådservietter til dyr: Deodoriserende vådservietter; Vådservietter til ører; Vådservietter til øjne; Generelle vådservietter; Grooming-vådservietter; Hypoallergene vådservietter; Vådservietter til poter; Vådservietter til tårepletter
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 寵物梳理用品 > 寵物濕紙巾: 除臭濕紙巾; 耳朵清潔濕紙巾; 眼部清潔濕紙巾; 一般清潔濕紙巾; 美容濕紙巾; 低過敏性濕紙巾; 腳爪清潔濕紙巾; 淚痕濕紙巾
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες περιποίησης κατοικίδιων ζώων > Μαντηλάκια για κατοικίδια ζώα: Αποσμητικά μαντηλάκια; Μαντηλάκια καθαρισμού αυτιών; Μαντηλάκια καθαρισμού ματιών; Μαντηλάκια γενικού καθαρισμού; Μαντηλάκια περιποίησης; Υποαλλεργικά μαντηλάκια; Μαντηλάκια καθαρισμού πατούσας; Μαντηλάκια για λεκέδες δακρύων
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Консумативи за подстригване на домашни любимци > Кърпички за домашни любимци: Дезодориращи кърпички; Кърпички за почистване на уши; Кърпички за почистване на очи; Почистващи кърпички; Кърпички за козина; Хипоалергенни кърпички; Кърпички за почистване на лапи; Кърпички за петна от сълзи
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Pribor za njegu kućnih ljubimaca > Maramice za kućne ljubimce: Dezodorirajuće maramice; Maramice za čišćenje ušiju; Maramice za čišćenje očiju; Maramice za opće čišćenje; Maramice za njegu; Hipoalergene maramice; Maramice za čišćenje šapa; Maramice za mrlje od suza
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Pet Grooming Supplies > Pet Wipes: Deodorizing Wipes; Ear Cleaning Wipes; Eye Cleaning Wipes; General Cleaning Wipes; Grooming Wipes; Hypoallergenic Wipes; Paw Cleaning Wipes; Tear Stain Wipes
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikin trimmaustarvikkeet > Lemmikin kosteuspyyhkeet: Hajunpoistopyyhkeet; Korvanpuhdistuspyyhkeet; Silmänpuhdistuspyyhkeet; Yleiset puhdistuspyyhkeet; Hoitopyyhkeet; Hypoallergeeniset pyyhkeet; Tassunpuhdistuspyyhkeet; Kyyneltahrapyyhkeet
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły groomerskie dla zwierząt > Nawilżane chusteczki dla zwierząt: Chusteczki dezodorujące; Chusteczki do czyszczenia uszu; Chusteczki do czyszczenia oczu; Uniwersalne chusteczki do czyszczenia; Chusteczki pielęgnacyjne; Chusteczki hipoalergiczne; Chusteczki do czyszczenia łap; Chusteczki do przebarwień pod oczami
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Produtos de beleza para animais de estimação > Lencinhos umedecidos para animais de estimação: Lencinhos umedecidos desodorizantes; Lencinhos umedecidos para limpeza de ouvidos; Lencinhos umedecidos para limpeza de olhos; Lencinhos umedecidos para limpeza geral; Lencinhos umedecidos de limpeza; Lencinhos umedecidos hipoalergênicos; Lencinhos umedecidos para limpeza das patas; Lencinhos umedecidos para manchas de lágrimas
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Utstyr for husdyrpleie > Husdyrservietter: Deodoriserende våtservietter; Ørerenseservietter; Øyerenseservietter; Generelle renseservietter; Pleieservietter; Hypoallergeniske servietter; Poterenseservietter; Tåreflekkservietter